test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num-ordinals_uptoten_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Noun - vuossâmuš:
    vuossâmuš+N+Sg+Nom: vuossâmuš # attr. vuossâmuš peivi
    vuossâmuš+N+Sg+Gen: vuossâmuu # attr. vuossâmuu peeivi
    vuossâmuš+N+Sg+Acc: vuossâmuu # attr. vuossâmuu peeivi
    vuossâmuš+N+Sg+Ill: vuossâmužân # attr. vuossâmuu piäiván
    vuossâmuš+N+Sg+Loc: vuossâmuust # attr. vuossâmuu peeivist
    vuossâmuš+N+Sg+Com: vuossâmuin # attr. vuossâmuin peivijn
    vuossâmuš+N+Sg+Abe: vuossâmuuttáá # attr. vuossâmuu peivittáá
    vuossâmuš+N+Ess: vuossâmužžân # attr. vuossâmuu peivin
    # vuossâmušov+N+Par: -
    vuossâmuš+N+Pl+Nom: vuossâmuuh # attr. vuossâmuuh peeivih
    vuossâmuš+N+Pl+Gen: vuossâmui # attr. vuossâmui peeivij
    vuossâmuš+N+Pl+Acc: vuossâmuid # attr. vuossâmuid peeivijd
    vuossâmuš+N+Pl+Ill: vuossâmuid # attr. vuossâmuid peivijd
    vuossâmuš+N+Pl+Loc: vuossâmuin # attr. vuossâmuin peeivijn
    vuossâmuš+N+Pl+Com: vuossâmuiguin # attr. vuossâmui peivijguin
    vuossâmuš+N+Pl+Abe: vuossâmuittáá # attr. vuossâmui peivijttáá

  Noun - nubbe:
    nubbe+N+Sg+Nom: nubbe
    nubbe+N+Sg+Gen: nube
    nubbe+N+Sg+Acc: nube
    nubbe+N+Sg+Ill: nuubán
    nubbe+N+Sg+Loc: nubbeest
    nubbe+N+Sg+Com: nubbijn
    nubbe+N+Sg+Abe: nubettáá
    nubbe+N+Ess: nubben
    # nubbe+N+Par: -
    nubbe+N+Pl+Nom: nubeh
    nubbe+N+Pl+Gen: [nuubij, nubij]
    nubbe+N+Pl+Acc: nuubijd
    nubbe+N+Pl+Ill: nubbijd
    nubbe+N+Pl+Loc: nuubijn
    nubbe+N+Pl+Com: nubijguin
    nubbe+N+Pl+Abe: nubijttáá

  Noun - kuálmád:
    kuálmád+N+Sg+Nom: kuálmád
    kuálmád+N+Sg+Gen: kuálmád
    kuálmád+N+Sg+Acc: kuálmád
    kuálmád+N+Sg+Ill: kuálmádân
    kuálmád+N+Sg+Loc: kuálmádist
    kuálmád+N+Sg+Com: kuálmádáin
    kuálmád+N+Sg+Abe: kuálmádttáá
    kuálmád+N+Ess: kuálmádin
    kuálmádbe+N+Par: -
    kuálmád+N+Pl+Nom: kuálmádeh
    kuálmád+N+Pl+Gen: kuálmádij
    kuálmád+N+Pl+Acc: kuálmádijd
    kuálmád+N+Pl+Ill: kuálmádáid
    kuálmád+N+Pl+Loc: kuálmádijn
    kuálmád+N+Pl+Com: kuálmádijguin
    kuálmád+N+Pl+Abe: kuálmádijttáá
    
  Noun - niäljád:
    niäljád+N+Sg+Nom: niäljád
    niäljád+N+Sg+Gen: niäljád
    niäljád+N+Sg+Acc: niäljád
    niäljád+N+Sg+Ill: niäljádân
    niäljád+N+Sg+Loc: niäljádist
    niäljád+N+Sg+Com: niäljádáin
    niäljád+N+Sg+Abe: niäljádttáá
    niäljád+N+Ess: niäljádin
    niäljádbe+N+Par: -
    niäljád+N+Pl+Nom: niäljádeh
    niäljád+N+Pl+Gen: niäljádij
    niäljád+N+Pl+Acc: niäljádijd
    niäljád+N+Pl+Ill: niäljádáid
    niäljád+N+Pl+Loc: niäljádijn
    niäljád+N+Pl+Com: niäljádijguin
    niäljád+N+Pl+Abe: niäljádijttáá
   
  Noun - viiđâd:
    viiđâd+N+Sg+Nom: viiđâd
    viiđâd+N+Sg+Gen: viiđâd
    viiđâd+N+Sg+Acc: viiđâd
    viiđâd+N+Sg+Ill: viđâdân
    viiđâd+N+Sg+Loc: viđâdist
    viiđâd+N+Sg+Com: viđâdáin
    viiđâd+N+Sg+Abe: viiđâdttáá
    viiđâd+N+Ess: viđâdin
    viiđâdbe+N+Par: -
    viiđâd+N+Pl+Nom: viđâdeh
    viiđâd+N+Pl+Gen: viđâdij
    viiđâd+N+Pl+Acc: viđâdijd
    viiđâd+N+Pl+Ill: viđâdáid
    viiđâd+N+Pl+Loc: viđâdijn
    viiđâd+N+Pl+Com: viđâdijguin
    viiđâd+N+Pl+Abe: vidâdijttáá

  Noun - kuuđâd:
    kuuđâd+N+Sg+Nom: kuuđâd
    kuuđâd+N+Sg+Gen: kuuđâd
    kuuđâd+N+Sg+Acc: kuuđâd
    kuuđâd+N+Sg+Ill: kuđâdân
    kuuđâd+N+Sg+Loc: kuđâdist
    kuuđâd+N+Sg+Com: kuđâdáin
    kuuđâd+N+Sg+Abe: kuuđâdttáá
    kuuđâd+N+Ess: kuđâdin
    kuuđâdbe+N+Par: -
    kuuđâd+N+Pl+Nom: kuđâdeh
    kuuđâd+N+Pl+Gen: kuđâdij
    kuuđâd+N+Pl+Acc: kuđâdijd
    kuuđâd+N+Pl+Ill: kuđâdáid
    kuuđâd+N+Pl+Loc: kuđâdijn
    kuuđâd+N+Pl+Com: kuđâdijguin
    kuuđâd+N+Pl+Abe: kuđâdijttáá

  Noun - čiččâd:
    čiččâd+N+Sg+Nom: čiččâd
    čiččâd+N+Sg+Gen: čiččâd
    čiččâd+N+Sg+Acc: čiččâd
    čiččâd+N+Sg+Ill: čiččâdân
    čiččâd+N+Sg+Loc: čiččâdist
    čiččâd+N+Sg+Com: čiččâdáin
    čiččâd+N+Sg+Abe: čiččâdttáá
    čiččâd+N+Ess: čiččâdin
    čiččâdbe+N+Par: -
    čiččâd+N+Pl+Nom: čiččâdeh
    čiččâd+N+Pl+Gen: čiččâdij
    čiččâd+N+Pl+Acc: čiččâdijd
    čiččâd+N+Pl+Ill: čiččâdáid
    čiččâd+N+Pl+Loc: čiččâdijn
    čiččâd+N+Pl+Com: čiččâdijguin
    čiččâd+N+Pl+Abe: čiččâdijttáá

  Noun - káávcád:
    káávcád+N+Sg+Nom: káávcád
    káávcád+N+Sg+Gen: káávcád
    káávcád+N+Sg+Acc: káávcád
    káávcád+N+Sg+Ill: kávcádân
    káávcád+N+Sg+Loc: kávcádist
    káávcád+N+Sg+Com: kávcádáin
    káávcád+N+Sg+Abe: káávcádttáá
    káávcád+N+Ess: kávcádin
    káávcádbe+N+Par: -
    káávcád+N+Pl+Nom: kávcádeh
    káávcád+N+Pl+Gen: kávcádij
    káávcád+N+Pl+Acc: kávcádijd
    káávcád+N+Pl+Ill: kávcádáid
    káávcád+N+Pl+Loc: kávcádijn
    káávcád+N+Pl+Com: kávcádijguin
    káávcád+N+Pl+Abe: kávcádijttáá

  Noun - oovcád:
    oovcád+N+Sg+Nom: oovcád
    oovcád+N+Sg+Gen: oovcád
    oovcád+N+Sg+Acc: oovcád
    oovcád+N+Sg+Ill: ovcádân
    oovcád+N+Sg+Loc: ovcádist
    oovcád+N+Sg+Com: ovcádáin
    oovcád+N+Sg+Abe: oovcádttáá
    oovcád+N+Ess: ovcádin
    oovcád+N+Par: -
    oovcád+N+Pl+Nom: ovcádeh
    oovcád+N+Pl+Gen: ovcádij
    oovcád+N+Pl+Acc: ovcádijd
    oovcád+N+Pl+Ill: ovcádáid
    oovcád+N+Pl+Loc: ovcádijn
    oovcád+N+Pl+Com: ovcádijguin
    oovcád+N+Pl+Abe: ovcádijttáá

  Noun - lovváád:
    lovváád+N+Sg+Nom: lovváád
    lovváád+N+Sg+Gen: lovváád
    lovváád+N+Sg+Acc: lovváád
    lovváád+N+Sg+Ill: lovádân
    lovváád+N+Sg+Loc: lovádist
    lovváád+N+Sg+Com: lovádáin
    lovváád+N+Sg+Abe: lovváádttáá
    lovváád+N+Ess: lovádin
    lovváád+N+Par: -
    lovváád+N+Pl+Nom: lovádeh
    lovváád+N+Pl+Gen: lovádij
    lovváád+N+Pl+Acc: lovádijd
    lovváád+N+Pl+Ill: lovádáid
    lovváád+N+Pl+Loc: lovádijn
    lovváád+N+Pl+Com: lovádijguin
    lovváád+N+Pl+Abe: lovádijttáá
